Idaho, session 2025, H0327.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 14, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1421, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1421. DELEGATION. (1) A nurse with appropriate education, train-
ing, and experience and who is licensed under this chapter may delegate to
a non-nurse tasks that do not involve the exercise of independent clinical
judgment, as long as the nurse responsible for delegation maintains proper
supervision and is satisfied that the person is qualified and adequately
trained.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "tasks that do not involve the ex-
ercise of independent clinical judgment" are duties that an individual has
received formal training to perform and that such individual is certified to
perform by a national organization acceptable to the board.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.